Source,Title,Headings,author,Published,Publish_Day,Publish_Month,Publish_Year,Publish_Time,Read_Time,Article
The Telegraph,Keir Starmer must lead the fight against Moscow,[],Hamish de Bretton-Gordon,2 July 2024 at 10:05 am·3-min read,2,July,2024,10:05:00,3,"As the UK seems likely to swing to the Left on Thursday, Labour’s beloved European Union is not just going Right, but is heading in the opposite ideological direction to Starmer’s party. On everything from migration to military intervention, Labour would find itself an outlier.This surge has a new champion: not France’s Marine Le Pen, but Hungary’s prime minister Victor Orban. The closest ally of Russian president Vladimir Putin among EU leaders, he has frequently opposed EU initiatives to support Ukraine in its defence against the illegal Russian invasion.Now, to make things even more unstable, Orban has announced plans for a new hard-Right bloc in the European Parliament to oppose further military support to Kyiv. He will be joined by Right facing allies from the Czech Republic and Austria in an attempt to form the new “Patriots for Europe”.If polls are to be believed, then Sir Keir Starmer’s foreign and military team are going to have to hit the ground sprinting on Friday morning. For be in no doubt: the Kremlin will fully test them over the next few weeks, using the EU elections – or Orban’s new prominence – as a springboard.Frankly, Hungary taking control of the EU Council, as is its right as a member, makes a mockery of the institution at a pivotal moment. You really can’t make it up: only a bureaucracy this narrow-minded and inflexible could dream of giving one of its most vocal critics such a huge platform. During Hungary’s six months in charge, it will set the tone of discussions, praising Putin at every opportunity, and attacking liberal institutions and values. Meanwhile, Ukraine will be desperately fighting to put itself in the best possible position before the US Presidential election in November, as is its right after experiencing the horror of continual Russian bombardment.Orban is at least in Kyiv today, visiting the Ukrainian president Zelensky for the first time since Russia’s full-scale invasion of Ukraine. That is something, but if you look at his recent remarks about not wanting to give Ukraine any weapons, you can see his real goal is to set the stage for peace negotiations. But any negotiations now, or any time soon, would mean allowing Russia to freeze the front lines with 18% of the country under illegal occupation. It should be unconscionable.Don’t believe me? Orban’s own press chief Bertalan Havasi said, “The most important topic of the talks is the chance to create peace.” This sounds like a comment coming out of the Kremlin, not Brussels. Putin must be delighted.As such, amid this crisis of leadership in Europe, Starmer, if he becomes PM on Friday, must focus on defence requirements before anything else. The Russians will exploit any weakness, and with a good many of his front bench having been in the past anti-Trident – including the Shadow Foreign Secretary, David Lammy – Putin will be rubbing his hands.Starmer should commit to go much further than the Tories in arming Ukraine, and make an immediate commitment to increase defence spending to 2.5% by the end of this parliament, showing he is truly serious and not another weak leader. He should remove those from defence or foreign roles who could weaken Britain’s deterrent, including Lammy, and should seek to be the voice Europe desperately needs as France looks inward, Germany cowers, and the EU is split.Get this wrong and all the ‘great things’ Labour is planning could become irrelevant very quickly. I have been appalled at the lack of defence-related debates at this election. Fundamentally, Labour could be facing war in Europe over the next few months if things go awry. That would mean us facing the most dangerous moment since the Second World War.Would Labour be up to the task in that circumstance? We would have to pray they would be. But the jury is out."
Yahoo News UK,"Who is Richard Tice? Reform’s former leader turned Farage sidekickThe candidate for Hartlepool has seen his party's popularity swell in recent months, with one poll showing reform ahead of the Conservatives.",[],Andrew Naughtie,Updated 14 June 2024 at 5:45 am·6-min read,14,June,2024,05:45:00,6,"Now that Nigel Farage has taken over as the leader of Reform UK, Richard Tice’s public profile is fading fast - but the Reform chairman remains involved in the party's operations.So far, the party has only one MP, Conservative defector Lee Anderson. But a recent poll has shown Reform overtaking the Tories, raising the possibility Anderson could hold his seat and even end up with fellow Reformers in the next Parliament.As the candidate for Hartlepool, where he stood as the Brexit Party candidate in 2019, Tice hopes to be one of them. So who is he, and what does he stand for?Childhood and educationBorn in Surrey in 1964 to James Tice, a showjumper, and Joan Tice, a horse trainer. Educated at the private boarding school Uppingham, he studied at the University of Salford, gaining a degree in construction economics and quantity surveying – teeing him up for a career that he said would ""continue the family genes in the property industry"".Family (partner & kids)Tice has three children from a 24-year marriage that ended in divorce. He is now in a long-term relationship with the right-wing writer and journalist Isabel Oakeshott.She is perhaps best known for two notorious incidents that set her against leading Tories: a book that featured the heavily disputed allegation that David Cameron had engaged in sexual activity with a pig, and the release of embarrassing messages entrusted to her by Matt Hancock when she agreed to write a book with him.Keir Starmer profile: The toolmakers' son vowing to 'rebuild Britain'Rishi Sunak profile: The PM battling to stay in power of election gambleHow to register to vote in the 2024 general electionWhich MPs are standing down before the next election? Full list mappedThe key issues that will decide the electionWhen is the first UK general election TV debate?What is purdah? The strict rule that governs what politicians can and can't sayNet worthWhile not quite in the same league as Rishi Sunak, Tice is one of the wealthiest people in British politics. As he describes it on his website, he made his multi-million-pound fortune over the course of “30 years of making things happen in property investment”, starting with a graduate job at a London firm in 1987.According to Tice, the company he leads as CEO, Quidnet Capital, has “bought and managed £500 million in commercial properties across the UK on behalf of clients”.He was also a key figure in the redevelopment of London’s Nine Elms district, near Battersea Power Station, a controversial project that has transformed a stretch of the Thames’s south bank with a welter of rapidly erected high-rise blocks.GB News linksAlong with Nigel Farage, Lee Anderson and several MPs on the right flank of the Tory party, Tice is a regular on the hard-right, culture war-focused TV outlet GB News. There he hosts a programme called “Richard Tice’s Sunday Sermon”, which serves as a platform for him to deliver his political analysis without the interruptions of an interviewer.However, despite the network being a relatively safe space for him in ideological terms, Tice’s appearances aren’t always amicable. A recent interview with host Andrew Pierce, a longtime right-wing commentator, saw him challenged fiercely about Reform’s chances in a summer election should one be called – with Pierce pointing to the “weirdos” selected by the party to fight numerous seats as evidence the party is “not ready”.Richard Tice, pictured in 2018 at a 'Leave Means Leave' campaign event, is focused on the issue of immigration. (Steve Finn/WENN)Tice was also involved in an incident that saw the network deemed in breach of broadcasting regulator Ofcom’s impartiality regulations, specifically an interview in which a former Brexit Party MEP failed to “sufficiently challenge” his views on immigration.The regulator is under increasing pressure to crack down on GB News heading into the election, with critics arguing it cannot be allowed to broadcast shows that feature Tory and Reform MPs interviewing each other without alternative points of view represented.Tice on NHSThe state and future of the NHS set to be one of this election’s main battlegrounds, and Reform’s key health policy is to spend £17 billion on the NHS on top of its current budget in an effort to get waiting lists down to zero. It also proposes introducing tax relief on private healthcare – something that has been criticised by opponents as a creeping step towards the privatisation of healthcare writ large.Tice’s stated rationale is that the reason the service is struggling is because the money it needs is being spent on other things that the public do not in fact support. Top of the list is Net Zero, which the party and its predecessors have long decried as a pointless “woke” project.In April, Tice used a press conference to frame the choice starkly. “We have a choice in this country, it seems to me,” he said. “A pretty clear choice. Do we want zero waiting lists in two years, and to keep them there? That is the Reform choice. Or do we want net zero CO2 emissions in 25 years? That is the Labour choice.”Tice on immigrationImmigration is by far Reform UK’s top issue, with the party looking to build on Farage’s two decades of campaigning against it in its legal and illegal forms.As far as the election goes, Tice and the party are targeting the continuing arrival of small boats of people travelling across the English Channel, many of them seeking asylum. He has criticised the government for failing to stop “mass immigration” post-Brexit, and described Rishi Sunak’s Rwanda policy as “a disaster”, arguing on GB News that its supposed deterrent value was revealed to be zero just hours after the House of Commons finally passed the law.Reform chairman Richard Tice (L) and leader Nigel Farage speak at the party's economic policy launch at Church House in London. (Alamy Live News)“Within a matter of hours more boats, absolutely packed full, overfilled with illegal migrants, were setting off from the beaches. And we learnt on Tuesday morning that sadly five people, including a young child, drowned leaving the beaches. That's not a deterrent. That's an absolute disaster.”Instead of deporting people to Rwanda, he is arguing for a “pick up and take back” policy that would see small boat arrivals deposited back on French soil. As evidence that this is both practical and humane, he has cited similar policies deployed in the US and Australia.However, he has not addressed the fact that Australia’s policy has been criticised internationally for leaving so-called “boat people” confined to facilities on the island of Nauru, where there have been incidents of suicide and self-immolation.Tice on cost of living crisisPerhaps unsurprisingly given he is trying to peel away former Tory voters, Tice has criticised recent Tory prime ministers harshly for overseeing Britain’s intense cost of living crisis. In 2022, he accused then-prime minister Boris Johnson of “waffling” over the situation. “Clueless, out of touch, no ideas, no help,” he tweeted. “Shocking.”He has also warned that the prospect of a “disastrous” Labour government will offer no prospect of meaningful relief for struggling households.Instead, Reform proposes lifting the minimum level of income tax to £20,000 while cutting various other taxes – among them fuel duty, another gesture to the party’s rejection of environmentalism as a top priority."
The Telegraph,"If Keir Starmer wins on Thursday, I warn you not to be middle-class",[],Philip Johnston,2 July 2024 at 8:58 am·6-min read,2,July,2024,08:58:00,6,"Thank goodness it’s nearly over. Six weeks of half truths, obfuscation, false hopes and downright lies delivered by tieless, shirt-sleeved leaders in a variety of factories, building sites or sports grounds in front of audiences made up principally of party activists clad in hi-vis jackets. Apart from Ed Davey, that is, who has preferred to campaign in theme parks.Mind-numbingly boring televised debates have supplanted the hustings of yore, which at least ran the risk of a politician being heckled. Not since John Major mounted his soap box in 1992 have party leaders really taken their campaign to the country in any direct way. Everything since has been stage-managed to death.Even the gaffes this time have been self-inflicted, like leaving the D-Day commemorations early or betting on the election date. Where was Gillian Duffy when we needed her to expose a prime minister’s true colours and provide some light relief? The only good laugh was the Putin poster stunt at Nigel Farage’s rally, not that the Reform UK leader found it very funny.After all the sound and fury, if it could be called that, where are we on the eve of polling? The Conservatives began 20-points behind Labour in the polls and remain there, though I suspect it will be closer when the votes are counted, more like 14 per cent as in 1997.If anything has happened it has been the slump of the Labour Party which was notching up 44 per cent support at the outset but is now around 38 per cent. This suggests the Tory tax warning may have affected Labour’s vote, though without benefiting the Tories, who have haemorrhaged support to Reform ever since Farage re-entered the fray.Anecdotally, it is clear that some of those voters are now saying they will stick with the Tories after all because they have not liked Farage’s position on Russia and a failure to purge racist candidates, which might provide the Tories with a few more votes on the day. Unfortunately for Mr Sunak, the Lib Dems look likely to take dozens of Tory seats in the South.Remarkably, there are still a large number of undecideds, which, given the Government’s indifferent record over 14 years, says a lot about the opposition. Sir Keir Starmer may be ahead in the polls and the likely next prime minister but he has hardly set the country alight with his “change” mantra. He may win the biggest majority proportional to the vote received in history but his personal rating is still negative.As the election finishing line approaches, those about to drown grab anything to keep them afloat. Mr Sunak’s passing piece of driftwood was the suggestion that if he can only persuade 130,000 people to switch to the Tories by tomorrow he can achieve a hung parliament and deny Labour a “supermajority”.Usually a sitting prime minister will insist that he can win until the bitter end, so this amounts both to a concession and wishful thinking. Those 130,000 would have to change their minds on a uniform basis in dozens of constituencies to bring about the outcome Mr Sunak now seeks.He could hardly have imagined when he stood in the pouring rain outside Downing St on May 22 that six weeks later he would have been urging voters to deliver a hung parliament as the best result he could hope for.Indeed, it is hard to know what he expected from a campaign that never really got off the ground. And even if they do take off do they ever change things markedly in any case? Haven’t most people made up their minds long before the starting gun is fired?There have been some notable exceptions. The 2017 election called by Theresa May when she was 20-points clear in the polls resulted in a hung parliament because the campaign was so awful. The 1992 election won against expectations by the Tories was lost by Labour long before Neil Kinnock’s hubristic “we’re all right” outburst at the eve-of-poll Sheffield Rally.The die was cast by John Smith’s shadow budget informing middle England’s voters how much extra tax they would have to pay. Labour has not made that mistake this time – they will jack up taxes but will not tell us where until after we have voted.The 2015 election handed an outright victory to the Conservatives for the first time in 18 years and was a surprise even to David Cameron who had expected a hung parliament. Labour was virtually wiped out in Scotland which accounted for most of its losses but Ukip also ate into some of its support in England, allowing the Tories to hang on to seats they might otherwise have lost.Other campaigns have hardly moved the dial at all. The most enervating was the 2001 election which saw precisely 13 seats change hands and is remembered principally for John Prescott punching an egg-throwing protester. It was also marked most by voter apathy, with a turnout under 60 per cent. There are fears it will not be much higher tomorrow, or even lower.The first election I covered as a political journalist was in 1983 where, again, the campaign made little difference to an outcome everyone predicted from the outset. There were some similarities to now. One of the parties, Labour back then, faced an insurgent newcomer threatening to wipe them off the map.The Lib-SDP Alliance polled 25 per cent of the vote yet won just 23 seats whereas Labour with 27 per cent won 209. Mrs Thatcher secured a “supermajority” of 144 with 42 per cent. Such are the vagaries of our electoral system.The final days of the 1983 campaign were enlivened by an over-the-top speech from Neil Kinnock, not then leader of the Labour Party but its most effective orator: “If Margaret Thatcher wins on Thursday, I warn you not to be ordinary, I warn you not to be young, I warn you not to fall ill, and I warn you not to grow old,” he said.Well, if Sir Keir Starmer wins on Thursday I warn you not to be reasonably well-off, not to have accumulated a sizeable pension pot, not to live in the Green Belt, not to be an entrepreneur and not to worry about your country’s borders.These points, indeed, have been the basis of the Tory campaign; only no one is listening any more, assuming they have even taken much notice from the start. A three-week dash to the polls would have been preferable to this drawn-out agony. The result would have been the same."
Yahoo News UK,Who is Keir Starmer? Son of a toolmaker who grew up to become a 'Sir'What you need to know about the personal life of the man who wants to be the UK’s next prime minister,"['His early life', 'His family', 'His parents', 'His education', 'Why is he a Sir?']",Hannah Fearn,Updated 1 July 2024 at 7:47 am·4-min read,1,July,2024,07:47:00,4,"The son of a toolmaker and the first of his family to go to university, Sir Keir Starmer is the most working class Labour Party leader in a generation.Yet when focus groups are asked what they think his favourite drink is, they guess that he’s partial to a gin and tonic rather than a pint down the local boozer. Many also assume his title is hereditary.Here's what you need to know about the personal life of the man who wants to be the UK’s next prime minister.His early lifeStarmer was born in Southwark, south London, in 1962, as the second of four children. His parents were Labour Party members and named him after Keir Hardie, the party’s first leader in parliament.The family moved out of the capital and he grew up in Hurst Green, a village just outside the small Surrey town of Oxted. He was active in youth politics from his teenage years but was also a skilled musician, taking music lessons alongside Norman Cook, who later became better known as a member of The Housemartins and the DJ Fatboy Slim.Starmer played the flute, piano, violin and recorder and was a junior exhibitioner at the Guildhall School of Music and Drama.His familyStarmer with his wife, Lady Victoria Starmer, at the Labour Party Conference in October 2023. (Alamy)Starmer is married to Victoria, a former solicitor who later retrained in occupational health and now works for the NHS. The pair met through their work in the law in the early 2000s and married in Essex in 2007.She was first seen accompanying her husband when the couple were filmed clapping for carers during the pandemic in 2020 outside their home in Camden. They have two children, a son and daughter, but both are kept out of the public eye.Victoria's father was Jewish and originally came from Poland, while her mother converted when they got married. Starmer has said in a previous interview that ""my wife in particular wants our children to know the faith of her family"" and that they ""observe some of the practices, for example Friday night prayers"".His parentsKeir Starmer with parents, Rodney and Josephine, at his graduation. (Twitter/Keir Starmer)The Labour leader's father, Rodney Starmer, worked as a toolmaker in a factory, and his mother Josephine Starmer (née Baker), was a nurse.His father worked 14-hour days but spent his time outside work caring for Josephine, who was diagnosed with the autoimmune condition Still’s disease. She required two hip and knee replacements twice in her lifetime and struggled with arthritic pain.As a young man Starmer also helped care for his mother, which he has said led to him being more emotionally reserved. His sister, Katy, recalled: “He’s had to be a grown-up all his life. I’ve always been quite open about my feelings – Keir is good at most things, but not that.” Josephine Starmer died in 2015, and his father three years later.His educationA photograph of a younger Starmer as shown on ITV's Piers Morgan's Life Stories in 2021. (ITV)Starmer passed the 11-plus examination, and attended Reigate Grammar School from age 11. While he was at the school it became an independent fee-paying institution, but as an existing student he was exempt from fees, and his tuition in the sixth form was covered by a bursary.After school he studied law at the University of Leeds, this first in his family to attend university, graduating with a first class degree in 1985. He undertook postgraduate law studied at the University of Oxford, where he served as editor of a radical magazine, Socialist Alternatives.Why is he a Sir?Keir Starmer pictured in 2010, when he was director of public prosecutions, making a statement about MPs who face charges over their expenses claims. (Getty)Starmer was appointed a Knight Commander of the Order of the Bath in 2014 in recognition of his work in the legal profession, culminating in a five-year term as director of public prosecutions (DPP).He first became a barrister in 1987 at the Middle Temple, later joining Doughty Street Chambers and was appointed a Queen’s counsel in 2002, aged just 39. In 2008 he was appointed head of the Crown Prosecution Service and DPP.During his tenure he chose to prosecute three Labour MPs and a Conservative in the wake of the parliamentary expenses scandal, and was responsible for prosecuting former MP Chris Huhne and his ex-wife Vicky Pryce for perverting the course of justice after Pryce claimed responsibility for her former husband’s speeding offence."
The Guardian,Tory tactics make this a rip-roaring election for the phrase ‘[citation needed]’,[],Marina Hyde,2 July 2024 at 10:45 am·6-min read,2,July,2024,10:45:00,6,"On Monday, a senior Tory said the party’s current campaign was “the worst in my lifetime”. Which, unless that senior Tory is under seven years old, really means something – because it takes in Theresa May’s Darwin award-winning effort in 2017. One thing on which Labour and the Conservatives might agree is that this has been a deliberately and relentlessly negative Tory campaign, with the overwhelming majority of messaging and campaign ads targeted as attack lines.And with that, a warm welcome back to Sir Sleepy! Sir Sleepy made his debut back in May, shortly after the election had been called, when an anonymous Tory aide suggested Keir Starmer lacked the stamina to campaign. Like many, I assumed Sir Sleepy would be the first in a family of seven attack lines which would also include Sir Dopey, Sir Grumpy, Sir Bashful, Sir Sneezy, Sir Happy and Sir Doc. Yet, somewhat ironically, the Sir Sleepy attack line then lay dormant after failing to take, being rudely reawakened only on Monday night in response to Starmer saying Friday night dinner was dedicated family time.“I haven’t finished by 6pm, ever,” retorted Rishi Sunak. (On the plus side, he may well be completely done in time for Spain-Germany this Friday.) The Sir part of Sir Sleepy is, presumably, a dig at Starmer for having been given a title. Please remember this in the wake of the election when we meet Sir James Forsyth and Sir Isaac Levido, the prime ministerial advisers who have been operating heavy party machinery when apparently feeling very sleepy indeed.Next up in our attack line roundup is the red piggy bank motif. The red piggy bank has served as an attack dog – an attack hog, if you will – designed to reinforce the message that Labour will leave you poorer. Cycling through the attack ads, though, it is never quite clear which red piggy bank is going to show up. Sometimes the piggy bank is cast as a villain, a giant malevolent presence looming behind the glass walls of the office of the “trade union equality officer”.Businesses, if you think Labour will win, start saving. pic.twitter.com/Jd5DYRi4hF— Conservatives (@Conservatives) June 12, 2024But at other times it is a poor, defenceless little piggy bank, caught in a sharp-toothed Labour tax trap.Labour’s Tax Trap Manifesto has deliberately refused to rule out 18 new tax rises - including on your family home, your pension, your car and your business. pic.twitter.com/Kc541a18uU— Conservatives (@Conservatives) June 14, 2024Performance-wise, I never really know what I’m getting. If I were the red piggy bank’s agent, I would say it needs to find a clear screen persona and stick to it.This is something Grant Shapps eventually did, of course, having previously appeared as Michael Green, Sebastian Fox, and Corinne Stockheath. In fact, it was Grant who was responsible for another Conservative attack line: “Don’t give Labour a supermajority.” The meticulous planning of the prime minister’s campaign is perhaps epitomised by this particular one. A “supermajority” is a) not a thing in British politics, b) just a random line Shappsy chucked out in passing, and c) now arguably the central and therefore presumably most effective plank of attack on Labour. Quite a journey when you consider that amazingly – like Rebekah Vardy bringing her court case against Colleen Rooney – this is an election Rishi Sunak called himself.Things Labour will do with a supermajority include: leave the UK without electricity, flatten the greenbelt, and cuff our coppers (no idea). They’re also going to reverse Brexit, apparently – though with new polling showing a majority of Britons now believe leaving the EU was a mistake and has delivered few benefits, this possibly ought to be filed under “threatening the voters with a good time”.Labour opposes stop and search. They wanted to take tasers off our police. Don’t give Keir Starmer a supermajority to do this. pic.twitter.com/NDNNE7BakV— Conservatives (@Conservatives) July 2, 2024Moving on, we were informed that voting for Starmer’s party will “lock in Labour for a generation”. And yet, will it? It feels right to put the Conservative strategists’ minds at rest by pointing out that during this notional generation, there will be multiple and frequent opportunities for voters to simply vote for someone else. Opportunities which – spoiler alert – they will sooner or later take. This form of government is known as democracy.Next we have “Labour’s £2,000 tax rise”. This is the one where Sunak said “independent Treasury officials” said Labour’s policies amounted to £2,000 tax rise for everyone. Independent Treasury officials quickly wrote to say they didn’t actually say that. The attack was arguably further deadened by the fact that under the Conservatives, the tax burden has grown to its highest level in 70 years. Current poll positions suggest that either it failed to land, or we’re in “voters willing to pay £2,000 if it means Conservatives will go away” territory.By the way, Labour also want to abolish the monarchy. Yup, it has, quite frankly, been a rip-roaring election for the phrase “[citation needed]”. Furthermore, only one party breached royal protocol by featuring a picture of the king in a political ad. Naturally, I shan’t insult you by saying which.Nor will I offer you that other thing British voters are warned not to give Keir Starmer, a “blank cheque” – a phrase not hugely meaningful to anyone under the age of 40. Do not “surrender” your family to Labour, waving your big blank cheque like a white flag. Also, “don’t risk our food security”. That last one was – I think? – something to do with inheritance tax on farms. But it seemingly faded away midway through the campaign. They tried it as a position, but it didn’t get anywhere so they tried something else.Tell you who else is a flip-flopper: Keir Starmer! He backed Jeremy Corbyn, another Conservative attack line repeatedly sought to remind us, and this one seemed to make more headway than many of the others, judging by sceptical public questions to Starmer in debates and phone-ins. See also the issue of protecting single-sex spaces. Ronald Reagan famously said, “If you’re explaining, you’re losing,” and we might add that if you’re constantly saying “my position is clear on this”, then your position isn’t clear on this.What else? Oh, plenty. From national Ulez zones, to Labour preparing to leave Britain without military defences, to Sadiq Khan wanting to divide Britain (the London mayor is not, incidentally, standing in this election). Also: “Illegal migrants are waiting for a Starmer victory”. But why are they waiting? It’s not like they’ve been backward in coming forward – or rather, backward in coming across. The styling suggests that in Calais, there is a queue of people wishing to make small boat crossings who are waiting for 5 July.Labour, in contrast, have stuck religiously to a very few simple attack lines, alongside their positive-adjacent message of “change”: 14 years of Tory chaos, Liz Truss made your poorer, and don’t wake up to five more years of this. Come Friday, this will surely be proved a much less sensible idea than throwing 37 different negative things at the wall each week and seeing what, if anything, stuck [citation needed]."
Yahoo News UK,"Who is Rishi Sunak? PM battles to stay in power after election gambleAs the prime minister calls a snap election, here’s everything you need to know about Rishi Sunak and what he’s saying about the biggest issues in British politics","['Early life', ""Sunak's family"", 'His parents', 'His education', 'How much is he worth?', 'His religion', 'Sunak on... the NHS', 'Sunak on… immigration', 'Sunak on... the cost of living crisis', 'Sunak on... pensions']",Hannah Fearn,23 May 2024 at 6:21 am·8-min read,23,May,2024,06:21:00,8,"Rishi Sunak has the fight of his political life ahead of him after calling a snap general election for 4 July. The polls have consistently painted a very bleak picture for the prime minister, with Labour holding on to a double-digit poll lead over his Conservatives.Recent by-election results suggest that Labour is likely to win a landslide victory – but there’s still time for the PM to turn it around.Here’s everything you need to know about Sunak and what’s he’s saying about the biggest issues in British politics right now.Early lifeSunak was born in Southampton in 1980, the eldest of three children. His Indian parents both arrived from East Africa in the 1960s. A football-mad boy whose childhood idol was Matt Le Tissier, Sunak was described by the family’s neighbours as a child with “lovely manners”.In his youngest years, the PM attended Oakmount, a local private prep school, and later Stroud School in Romsey. According to a recent biography, fellow pupil Ollie Case said: “He was someone that was talked about. The teachers would say: ‘He’s going to be prime minister'.""But, growing up in the 1980s and 90s, he also remembers experiencing racism. “My mother was obsessed with us not having accents,” Sunak has said.Rishi Sunak was football-mad as a boy growing up in Southampton. (ITV)Sunak's familySunak is married to Akshata Murty, the daughter of an Indian entrepreneur and multi-billionaire. The pair first met in 2004 at Stanford University, his future wife apparently attracted to his “honesty and integrity”.Five years later they married in a two-day Indian wedding held in Bangalore. The couple have two daughters, Krishna and Anoushka, who will turn 13 and 11 this year, both of whom are largely kept out of the public eye.Sunak attended Oakmount, a local private prep school, and later Stroud School in Romsey. (Rishi Sunak, Instagram)His parentsYashvir Sunak, Rishi’s father, was born in Kenya. He arrived in the UK to study medicine and then stayed, becoming an NHS GP. His mother, Usha, was born in Tanzania and is a pharmacist.The couple met in Britain and settled in Southampton in the 1970s. Usha is still the director and lead pharmacist at Sunak Pharmacy in Southampton.His educationAs a teenager Sunak studied at Winchester College where he was, he says, a self-confessed “geek”. According to a recent biography, the “naughtiest” thing the prime minister did during his school days “was to smuggle a hand-held television into the school so that he did not miss any key games of Euro 96”.The childhood home of Rishi Sunak in Southampton. (Getty Images, photo taken in 2022)Perhaps unsurprisingly for someone with such an unblemished record, he went on to become the school’s head boy. Sunak worked while studying, delivering medicines for his mother’s pharmacy and as a waiter at a local Indian restaurant.After school, Sunk read philosophy, politics and economics at Lincoln College, Oxford, graduating in 2001 with a first class degree. While still at university he held an internship at the Conservative Party campaign headquarters and joined the party, but went on studying before entering politics.He earned his MBA from Stanford in 2006 as a Fulbright Scholar, meaning he was selected among the most promising candidates from the UK.How much is he worth?As prime minister, Rishi Sunak earns £80,807 on top of a salary of £84,144 for being an MP. But his current income from Westminster pales in comparison to his family’s vast wealth through marriage.The Sunday Times valued the couple’s joint fortune at £730m. Murty's father is the co-founder of Infosys, an Indian tech conglomerate, in which she holds shares estimated at around £430m. Her family is also involved in a £900m business arrangement with Amazon in India, and she is a shareholder of multiple other companies.Rishi Sunak's mother is still the director and lead pharmacist at Sunak Pharmacy in Southampton.Before entering politics Sunak worked for Goldman Sachs and a series of hedge funds. He is also known to have invested in blind trusts, in which investments are made without holders knowing where the funds are located. These arrangements reportedly hold Sunak’s own multi-million-pound fortune.His religionSunak is not only the first prime minister of colour and of Indian heritage but he is also the first practising Hindu to hold the biggest job in UK politics.He has spoken of his pride in his Hindu faith, saying, “that’s how I was raised, and that’s how I am”. He said: “Having faith gives you resilience, gives you strength that is important and it provides an outlook on life which I find particularly valuable.”Sunak on... the NHSThe prime minister’s biggest challenge in office has been the crisis in the NHS - and to many people in the sector his government has been found wanting. “We have not made enough progress,” Sunak said when asked about his commitment to cut NHS waiting lists during an interview with Piers Morgan on TalkTV. Asked if that meant he had failed, the prime minister replied: “Yes, we have.""Sunak expects to see waiting lists start to reduce this spring, and blames the delays on “industrial action”, as disputes with junior doctors and consultants over pay and conditions continue. Yet Sunak himself has been blamed for holding up a deal that would prevent more walkouts.Sunak, his wife Akshata and daughters Anoushka and Krishna (second left) at Santa Monica Pier, California, on their summer holiday in 2023. (AP)Sunak on… immigrationAccording to the prime minister, illegal migration threatens to “overwhelm” Europe. In June 2023 he claimed his plan to “stop the boats” and tackle illegal immigration was working, but by August 2023 he had changed his mind: “It’s not an easy problem to fix,” he told broadcasters. “I never said we would be able to solve it overnight.”He has staked much of his reputation on the government's Rwanda Bill - his plan to deport asylum seekers to the east African country that finally became law last month, after months of legal and procedural challenges. It has paved the way for deportation flights to get off the ground within weeks.He described his policy, which he says will act as a deterrent to people traffickers, as being “the will of the people” – yet polling suggests low support for such a punitive approach.The policy, coupled with Conservative talk of limits on legal migration, shows that the government is committed to taking a hard line on the issue, despite the risk of alienating more moderate voters.The Rwanda policy is not universally popular. (YouGov)Sunak on... the cost of living crisisThe prime minister has told hard-pressed working families that they will feel some relief from the cost of living crisis as inflation continues to drop following its highs of October 2022. He described the government’s tax cuts as “meaningful” and has welcomed the dip in mortgage rates at the turn of the year.Sunak says falling inflation will have the biggest impact on family budgets “and will start to ease some of those pressures” and that he was right to focus on that figure. However, the global drop in energy prices is probably the biggest factor in easing the hit on wallets - something that the prime minister has no control over.However, the fall in inflation to 2.3% on 22 May this year – the lowest it has been in nearly three years – was likely one of the key factors in persuading Sunak to call a snap election many weeks earlier than experts had predicted.Can we expect more handouts or tax breaks to help balance family budgets? Not according to Sunak, who has warned voters that it’s time to “move on” from government support.Sunak on... pensionsThe triple-lock pensions policy is a tricky one for Sunak – especially since Labour has committed to retaining the policy. Any change to a policy that has become a hallmark of recent Conservative governments would not go down well with the 12 million pensioners it would likely impact – many of whom are lifelong Tory voters.Last November, the Organisation for Economic Co-operation and Development (OECD) said pensions should start being pegged to an average of inflation and wage growth, which would help reduce state spending over time.Sunak’s response to that was ambiguous to say the least: “We are the government that has … delivered the triple lock and it is why, right now, pensions are, depending on how you look at it, £800 or £900 bigger than they otherwise would have been.” He is yet to confirm whether it will appear in the manifesto."
Yahoo News UK,Who is standing for election in my area? Full list of candidatesUse our searchable map and table to find out the prospective MPs in your constituency.,"['Who is standing in my constituency?', 'When was the deadline to register to vote?', 'What photo ID do I need?', 'How many constituencies are there?']",Jimmy Nsubuga,Updated 27 June 2024 at 11:10 am·2-min read,27,June,2024,11:10:00,2,"Voters are casting their ballots to determine the next prime minister.The 4 July general election follows weeks of campaigning by the political parties after Rishi Sunak called a snap vote on 22 May.And while the names of the party leaders may be well known, you also need to know who you are voting for in your own constituency.Who is standing in my constituency?Find your constituency on the map below to see the list of the candidates from the main political parties standing in your local area.If you aren't sure of the full name of your constituency, you can quickly search for its name by entering your postcode or location here.You can also check out our searchable database below to see a list of all the candidates standing in your area.When was the deadline to register to vote?In order to vote you must have registered to vote by 18 June.You do not need to bring a polling card to vote, but you will need to bring a form of accepted ID.What photo ID do I need?This is the first general election where voters will need to bring a form of ID in order to cast their ballot. Many forms of ID are accepted, including passports, driving licences and blue badges. A full list of the IDs that are accepted can be found here.Anyone without these forms of voter ID – or who no longer looks like the photo on their ID, or whose name on their ID is different to their name on the electoral register – needed to apply for a special ID for free here, but the 5pm 26 June deadline has passed.How many constituencies are there?The UK is divided into 650 constituencies, and despite the recent change in their boundaries, the numbers are the same as the last general election.Within the four countries of the UK, the number of constituencies has changed reflecting England's growing population.The constituencies broken down by country lines are:England: 543 (+10 from the previous election)Scotland: 57 (-2)Wales: 32 (-8)Northern Ireland: 18 (no change)"
Yahoo News UK,The Tory ministers and 'big beasts' who could lose MP seats in the electionSeveral big names in the Conservative Party are at risk of losing their seats in the general election.,"['Grant Shapps', 'Penny Mordaunt', 'Liz Truss', 'Jacob Rees-Mogg', 'Johnny Mercer', 'Victoria Prentis', 'Alex Chalk', 'David TC Davies']",Andy Wells,Updated 20 June 2024 at 2:51 am·5-min read,20,June,2024,02:51:00,5,"Rishi Sunak could become the first prime minister to lose his seat in a general election, according to new bombshell polling.According to the Savanta poll, which was commissioned by The Telegraph, the Conservatives are projected to win just 53 seats in the general election. Some three-quarters of the Cabinet would lose their seats in that scenario – including Sunak.Were Sunak to lose his seat in Richmond (Yorks), it would make him the first prime minister in history to lose their seat in a general election, according to the Institute for Government. Chancellor Jeremy Hunt is also facing a battle to hold on to his constituency, with the vote on a “knife edge”.Savanta spoke to around 18,000 people between 7 June and 18 June for their poll. If reflected in the election, Labour would be on course to win 516 seats, with a commanding Commons majority of 382. The Liberal Democrats would have nearly as many seats (50) as the Tories.Jeremy Hunt: My constituency is on a knife edgeHunt could be among the Conservative casualties on the night of the 4 July poll, despite his newly-created seat in Godalming and Ash currently holding a Conservative majority of more than 10,000. He is facing a battle to win the seat in Surrey, with the Liberal Democrats keen on taking a high-profile scalp.Several other Tory ‘big beasts’ also face a tight vote to hold onto their seat, according to a major poll by Ipsos.Grant ShappsDefence secretary Grant Shapps may lose his seat in the election. (Getty)Defence secretary Grant Shapps, who had been touted as a potential leader of the Conservatives after the election, is at risk of losing his Welwyn Hatfield seat, according to Ipsos. Their polling suggests a likely Labour victory, with Sir Keir Starmer’s party currently on 48%, compared to 28% for the Conservatives.Shapps won the seat in the 2019 election with a vote share of 52.6%, increasing his majority from the previous election.Penny MordauntPenny Mordaunt’s seat is at risk from Labour. (PA)Penny Mordaunt, the leader of the House of Commons, is another Tory MP whose name has been mentioned in a future leadership contest – in the event of the Tories losing the election. However, she may not even be an MP after 4 July as her Portsmouth North seat is at risk.Seen as “leaning Labour”, polling suggests Labour are on 42%, compared to the Tories on 34%. She won 61.4% of the vote in the 2019 election.Liz TrussFormer prime minister Liz Truss may not be an MP after the election. (PA)Former prime minister Liz Truss is at risk in her South West Norfolk seat. The seat is seen as a “toss up”, with Truss currently in the lead at 31%. Labour are a sitting at 27% but Reform UK are polling 30%.Allowing for margins of error and another two weeks of campaigning, the seat will be hotly contested between all three parties on 4 July.Jacob Rees-MoggJacob Rees-Mogg is on track to lose his seat at the general election. (PA)While no longer a government minister, Jacob Rees-Mogg losing his North East Somerset and Hanham seat would perhaps be one of the night’s bigger surprises. Rees-Mogg has been an outspoken critic of some of Sunak’s policies and is a regular presenter on GB News.However, the Ipsos poll has the seat, which has been newly-created for the 2024 election, is currently showing a “likely Labour” win, with the party on 47%, compared to 30% for the Conservatives.Johnny MercerPolling suggests Johnny Mercer will lose his seat to Labour at the election. (PA)Veterans’ affairs secretary Johnny Mercer is standing for the Plymouth Moor View seat, having last won the seat in 2019 with an increased vote share of 60.7%. However, a “likely” Labour win is expected, with a projected vote share of 49% on 4 July. The Tories are currently polling at 30% – half of what they won in 2019.Victoria PrentisAttorney general Victoria Prentis is currently facing being replaced by Labour in the election. (PA)A “likely” Labour victory is predicted for Banbury, a seat currently held by attorney general Victoria Prentis. The Tories are polling at 30% in the constituency, compared to 40% for Labour. Prentis is notable for being the first British MP to take a Ukrainian refugee in her house following Russia’s invasion.Alex ChalkThe Libreal Democrats are projected to take over justice secretary Alex Chalk’s seat. (Alamy)Justice secretary Alex Chalk won 48% of the vote in the Cheltenham constituency in the 2019 election. However, the seat is now leaning to being “strong Liberal Democrat”, with Sir Ed Davey’s party polling 60% of the vote. Chalk and the Conservatives are projected to win 26% of the vote, according to Ipsos.David TC DaviesDavid TC Davies is projected to lose his seat in the general election. (PA)Welsh secretary David TC Davies is facing a “likely” Labour victory on 4 July, with the party projected to win 45% of the vote, compared to 30% for the Tories. The constituency has predominately been held by the Tories, with Davies himself representing the seat since 2005.Your guide to votingHow to register to vote in the 2024 general electionWhat voter ID can I bring to the election?Who is standing in my constituency? Full list of every candidate mappedThe manifestosWhat is a manifesto?The conservative election manifesto - in briefThe Lib Dem manifesto - in briefThe Labour manifesto - in briefThe leadersWho is Rishi Sunak? The PM battling to stay in power after election gambleWho is Keir Starmer? The toolmaker's son promising change for the UKWho is Ed Davey? Lib Dem leader attracting attention with election stuntsWho is Richard Tice? Reform’s former leader turned Farage sidekick "
Yahoo News UK,"Confused by election jargon? The common words and phrases explainedCertain phrases such as the 'triple lock plus' have also become defining issues of the election, with the terms bandied about by politicians on both sides.","['Absentee ballot', 'Ballot box', 'Campaign', 'Canvassing', 'Capital gains tax', 'Child benefit', 'Coalition', 'Constituency', 'ECHR', 'Exit poll', 'First past the post', 'Hung parliament', 'Income tax threshold', 'Majority', 'Manifesto', 'Marginal seat', 'Net zero', 'Opinion poll', 'Poll', 'Postal vote', 'Proxy vote', 'Psephology', 'Polling day', 'Purdah', 'Spoiled ballot', 'Swing', 'Tax burden', 'The Equality Act', 'Triple lock', 'Triple lock plus', 'Turnout', 'VAT']",Rob Waugh,Updated 13 June 2024 at 8:43 am·7-min read,13,June,2024,08:43:00,7,"From 'purdah' to 'first past the post', every election in the UK is surrounded by specialist jargon that can leave some voters struggling to fully understand the conversation around them.In the 2024 election, certain phrases – such as the 'triple lock plus' – have also become defining issues, with the terms bandied about by politicians on both sides.Below, we've defined some of the most widely used and confusing terms around British elections (and the 2024 election in particular).Absentee ballotIf people can’t get to a polling station on election day, they can apply for an absent vote.There are two kinds: a postal vote, where a ballot is mailed in, and a proxy vote, where someone else votes for you.At the 2019 general election, 17.2% of voters across the UK used a postal ballot and 0.6% appointed a proxy.Ballot boxThe box where people put their voting slips. The term is also sometimes used to refer to the election itself, as in ‘they could not win at the ballot box’.CampaignThe time before an election in which politicians persuade people to vote for them. In the case of the 2024 election in the UK, parliament was dissolved on the 30 May and the election will take place on 4 July.CanvassingGoing round a particular area trying to persuade people to vote for one party or the other.In UK elections, this is often done by volunteers knocking on people’s doors.Capital gains taxCapital gains tax is a tax on profit when people sell assets that have increased in value.In the 2024 election, the Conservatives have promised that landlords who sell to sitting tenants will be spared capital gains tax on the proceeds, while Labour has left the door open to raising capital gains.Child benefitChild benefit is a benefit paid to parents with children under 16 (or under 20 in approved education or training).The Conservatives have promised to increase the threshold at which high earners start to lose the benefit from £60,000 to £120,000.Sir Keir Starmer, like the Conservatives, has pledged not to raise VAT. (Photo by Stefan Rousseau/PA Images via Getty Images)CoalitionA coalition government is a government formed jointly by more than one political party (for example, by the Liberal Democrats and Conservatives in 2010).ConstituencyThe geographical area that is represented by each MP in the House of Commons.ECHRThe European Convention on Human Rights (ECHR) is an international convention which protects human rights in Europe.The Conservative manifesto stopped short of promising to withdraw from the ECHR, which would have made plans such as the plan to deport migrants to Rwanda easier.Exit pollA poll conducted outside polling stations just after people have voted on election day.On election day, the results of Britain’s exit poll are published just after polls close at 10pm and tend to give a more accurate prediction of the result than previous polls produced throughout the campaign.First past the postThe first past the post system is used to elect MPs to the House of Commons.The candidate with the most votes in each constituency becomes MP, and the party with the most MPs becomes the government.This can mean that the winning party actually has a minority of votes cast: in 2019, the Conservatives had 43.6% of the vote.Hung parliamentA hung parliament is where no party has enough seats to form an overall majority. For example, both the 2010 election and 2017 elections resulted in hung parliament.In 2010, the Conservatives formed a coalition with the Liberal Democrats, while in 2017, the Conservatives formed a minority government with a 'confidence and supply' agreement with the Democratic Unionist Party (DUP).Income tax thresholdThe thresholds between the tax-free allowance, basic rate tax and higher rates of tax.Both parties have said they will continue the freeze on income tax thresholds brought in under the Conservatives, which means people pay more tax as more and more people are pushed into higher tax brackets if wages rise.MajorityA party with a majority – more than half of the seats in the House of Commons – has won the election.The number of votes by which an individual MP wins a constituency is also referred to as their majority.ManifestoPolitical parties publish manifestos before a general election, with a set of policies that the party stands for and aims to implement if elected.Manifesto pledges are not legally binding.Marginal seatA seat in which the incumbent MP won by a small majority, meaning a swing is more likely than in a so-called ‘safe seat’ where the MP had a large majority.Net zeroThe UK Government has set a goal for Britain’s emissions to reach net zero – where emission and removal of greenhouse gases reaches equilibrium – by 2050.All major parties are expected to stick to this goal, barring Reform UK.Opinion pollAn opinion poll is a research survey (usually carried out on a representative sample of the electorate) to gauge likely results in an election.Poll‘The polls’ refers to the places where people vote in an election: exit polls and opinion polls refer to two kinds of survey used to predict election results.Postal voteAn absentee vote where the vote is sent in by post.At the 2019 general election, 17.2% of voters across the UK used a postal ballot.Proxy voteA vote where a person who can’t make it to the booth appoints someone to vote for them.In the 2019 election, 0.6% of voters appointed a proxy.PsephologyPsephology is the scientific study of elections and voting and is used to predict and analyse election results.Polling dayThe day when the country places their vote: in the UK 2024 election, this is July 4.PurdahBefore British elections, the country enters purdah, officially known as the ‘pre-election period of sensitivity’.Purdah means that politicians (both local and national) and other people such as civil servants face restrictions on what they can do and announce.Ministers who remain in office can’t announce new funding, or new policies, or anything which might sway voters or make the government more popular.The idea is that public money cannot be spent on the election.Spoiled ballotA ballot paper which has been marked wrongly (for instance with a vote for more than one candidate) will not be counted.Sometimes people spoil ballots deliberately as a protest vote to show dissatisfactionSwing‘Swing’ is the change in voter support for a political party between one election and the next.It is used to analyse the performance of parties in different areas.Tax burdenThe tax burden refers to the total amount of taxes paid by a group (in this case the UK as a whole) as a proportion of total income.The tax burden is currently at its highest in 70 years according to the OECD.The Equality ActThe 2010 Equality Act protects people against discrimination in Britain.The Conservatives want to ‘tweak’ the Act so that sex-based protections only apply on the basis of someone’s biological sex.Triple lockThe triple lock is a guarantee introduced to the state pension in 2010 so it would not lose value in real terms.The guarantee means that the state pension will rise by the highest out of average earnings, inflation as measured by the consumer price index (CPI) or 2.5%.Triple lock plusThe ‘triple lock plus’ is a Conservative policy, which would see the tax-free pension allowance rise every year in line with the triple lock of average wages, inflation, or 2.5% – whichever is highest, to prevent pensioners being pulled into paying income tax.TurnoutTurnout refers to the percentage of people eligible to vote who turn out to vote on election day.In the 2019 election, for example, 67.3% of those eligible turned out to vote.VATValue added tax is added to goods and services sold by VAT-registered companies, and is the third-largest source of government income after income tax and national insurance.Both Labour and the Conservatives have pledged not to raise VAT.Keir Starmer profile: The toolmakers' son vowing to 'rebuild Britain'Rishi Sunak profile: The PM battling to stay in power of election gambleHow to register to vote in the 2024 general electionWhich MPs are standing down before the next election? Full list mappedThe key issues that will decide the electionWhen is the first UK general election TV debate?What is purdah? The strict rule that governs what politicians can and can't say"
Yahoo News UK,"3 electoral maps that show how disastrous the election could be for the ToriesWith new modelling predicting a Labour victory even bigger than Tony Blair's 1997 landslide, the outlook for Rishi Sunak is not looking good.",['Which Tory ministers are at risk of losing their seats?'],James Cheng-Morris and  James Hockaday,Updated 5 June 2024 at 7:34 am·4-min read,5,June,2024,07:34:00,4,"The outlook was already looking bleak for the Conservative Party when Rishi Sunak called the general election following months of dismal approval ratings that showed little sign of improving.At a campaign event last week, Sunak said he didn't think defeat to Labour was a ""foregone conclusion"", suggesting his main election rival Sir Keir Starmer was taking the British electorate ""for granted"".However, a general election projection released on Monday will have added to the Tories' woes – predicting the biggest win for Labour in the party's history, surpassing even that of Tony Blair's 1997 landslide.The analysis, carried out by YouGov for Sky News, used a relatively new polling technique called Multi-level Regression and Post-stratification (MRP), which is regarded to have had a good track record and can provide detailed predictions at a constituency level basis. The scale of Sunak's problems is demonstrated by the interactive maps below, showing just how much ground the Tories are expected to lose compared to their 2019 victory.Click on the arrows in the top left to switch between the two maps. Check your own constituency to see if it is projected to change handsThe first map above shows the seats won in the 2019 general election, when Boris Johnson led the party to a stunning majority.The wall of Tory blue on the map, compared to the spots of Labour red, is a demonstration of just how far Labour, then led by Jeremy Corbyn, had fallen in public standing. The result was Labour's worst electoral performance since 1935.If you toggle to the second map, the projection by YouGov (which was based on polling carried out between 24 May - 1 June) suggests that Starmer's party is on track to win 422 seats, with the Tories down to just 140.Such a result would be the Conservative Party's worst performance at a general election since 1906. If YouGov's predictions are accurate, Labour winning a 194-seat majority would be the highest number since Conservative Stanley Baldwin won a majority of 208 in 1924.The model suggests the Conservatives could be set for near wipeout across many areas of the country, including London, the North East, the North West, and Wales.It also projects that the Scottish National Party would lose more than half their seats, with Labour returning as the largest party north of the border, and the Liberal Democrats reclaiming its place as the third party of British politics – winning 48 seats.The new figures, released yesterday, came as Reform UK co-founder Nigel Farage announced that he would be returning as the populist party's leader and would stand for election in Clacton-on-Sea, Essex. Even before Farage's latest bid, pollsters told Yahoo News that Reform UK could pose a serious threat to the Tories by splitting the vote and potentially handing even more seats to Labour.The YouGov projection follows a similar poll by modelling site Electoral Calculus, which came out on 31 May. The polling also compares the 2019 result with Electoral Calculus' projection.It predicts that Labour is on course to win an even bigger majority of 319 seats - with Starmer's party picking up 485 MPs and the Tories way behind with 66. The modelling shows the Lib Dems getting very close to the Conservative Party, with 59 seats.While Electoral Calculus' polling, based on opinion polls from 8 May to 20 May, returns a different set of projections to YouGov's, both clearly indicate the scale of the problem facing Sunak.The Electoral Calculus model has predicted Sir Keir Starmer's Labour will win a massive majority. (Getty Images)Which Tory ministers are at risk of losing their seats?According to YouGov's polls this week, 12 out of 26 cabinet members running for re-election could lose their seats on 4 July.""These are some of the biggest names in our politics,"" deputy political editor Sam Coates said as he presented the findings on Sky News. ""Every single one of these, right now, is projected on course to lose at the general election.""Those ministers are:Jeremy Hunt, chancellor: Predicted to lose Godalming and Ash seat to the Liberal Democrats by 15 pointsGrant Shapps, defence secretary: Predicted to lose Welwyn Hatfield to Labour by 18 pointsPenny Mordaunt, Commons leader: Predicted to lose Portsmouth North to Labour by five pointsMark Harper, transport secretary: Predicted to lose Forest of Dean to Labour by four pointsAlex Chalk, justice secretary: Predicted to lose Cheltenham by 31 points to the Liberal Democrats by 31 pointsMel Stride, work and pensions secretary: Predicted to lose Central Devon to Labour by one pointJonny Mercer, defence minister: Predicted to lose Plymouth Moor View to Labour by 11 pointsEsther McVey, minister without portfolio: Predicted to lose Tatton to Labour by one pointGillian Keegan, education secretary: Predicted to lose Chichester to the Lib Dems by five pointsSimon Hart, chief whip: Predicted to lose Caerfyrddin to Labour by nine pointsDavid T C Davies, Welsh secretary: Predicted to lose Monmouthshire to Labour by 11 pointsVictoria Prentis, attorney general: Predicted to lose Banbury to Labour by six pointsKeir Starmer profile: The toolmakers' son vowing to 'rebuild Britain'Rishi Sunak profile: The PM battling to stay in power of election gambleHow to register to vote in the 2024 general electionWhich MPs are standing down before the next election? Full list mappedThe key issues that will decide the electionWhen is the first UK general election TV debate?What is purdah? The strict rule that governs what politicians can and can't say"
Sky News,Royal Mail blames government for general election postal ballot delays,[],Sky News,Updated 2 July 2024 at 8:09 am·4-min read,2,July,2024,08:09:00,4,"Royal Mail has blamed the government for voters not receiving their postal ballots ahead of Thursday's election - and said there is ""no backlog"" in its system.Earlier on Tuesday, Conservative minister Maria Caulfield told Sky News the government is ""urgently"" investigating why some people have still not received their postal ballots just two days before the election.There are reports of thousands of postal ballots not being delivered in time, with postal affairs minister Kevin Hollinrake calling on Royal Mail ""to do all they can"" to make sure postal votes get to people in time.Follow live general election updatesMore than 90 constituencies, including those of cabinet ministers, have raised concerns about ballots failing to arrive, according to The Telegraph.But Royal Mail said it is delivering postal votes as soon as they arrive in its network - and has called for a review of how the printing and administration of postal votes is handled before the ballot papers are given to Royal Mail.A Royal Mail spokesman said: ""We have no backlog of postal votes and, whilst we are not complacent, we remain confident that postal votes handed to us on time will be delivered prior to polling day.""Where specific concerns have been raised, we have investigated and confirmed ballot packs are being delivered as soon as they arrive in our network.""We would welcome a review into the timetable for future elections with all stakeholders to ensure that the system for printing and administering postal votes before they are handed to Royal Mail works as smoothly as possible.""It is understood Mr Hollinrake has not raised his concerns with Royal Mail directly and the postal company has been in regular contact with the elections minister and authorities ahead of, and throughout, the election period.Before Royal Mail commented, Ms Caulfield told Sky News: ""Kevin [Hollinrake] is taking this very seriously. He's in direct contact with the Royal Mail. Kevin is investigating this urgently.""I know there's extra resources going into this to try and do a sweep of all the sorting offices and make sure they're out there.""She added she is aware of ""a number of"" constituencies where people have not yet received their postal votes.Ms Caulfield said those who will be at home on polling day this Thursday and have received a postal vote late can take them to their local polling station.However, she said it is a concern for those who are away as the deadline to apply for a proxy vote, where someone else is allowed to vote on your behalf, has passed.Read more:Five things the main parties aren't talking aboutManifesto Checker: The parties' key pledgesConcerns in ScotlandThere are specific concerns for voters in Scotland as schools broke up for the summer holidays on Friday, so many families have already left the country.The SNP's Stephen Flynn told Sky News the situation is a ""shambles"" and said his party had warned the Conservatives not to hold the election now as so many families in Scotland would be on holiday.He said the government told them they could vote by post so the fact they have not received their ballots in time is ""outrageous"" and could affect the outcome of the vote where seats are tight.He said the blame ""lies at Sunak's doorstep"".25% voting by postAt the last general election, in 2019, 21% of people voted by post.That number is expected to have increased by 20%, with more than 1.3 million postal vote applications made between 22 May and 19 June, according to the Local Government Association.A spokesman said: ""This unprecedented increase adds more pressure to an already complex process and overburdened system.""Councils and electoral staff across the country have been doing their utmost to ensure the smooth running of this election and that people can vote.""We are aware of reports of incidents where delays have happened. The postal vote system could benefit from review and more could be done to support Royal Mail and printers to be ready to deliver elections.""👉 Tap here to follow Politics at Jack and Sam's wherever you get your podcasts 👈The deadline to register to vote by post was 19 June, with ballots normally arriving around a week before polling day.Postal votes have to arrive by 10pm on polling day."
The Independent,Rishi Sunak stacks shelves at Morrisons days ahead of general election,[],Oliver Browning,2 July 2024 at 9:15 am·1-min read,2,July,2024,09:15:00,1,"Rishi Sunak stacked the shelves at a Morrisons supermarket in Oxfordshire while on the general election campaign trail.The prime minister spoke to employees alongside Rami Baitieh, CEO of Morrisons, on Tuesday 2 July.He was then seen filling the shelves with freshly baked bread, before finishing up and asking “are you happy with that?”Mr Sunak made a campaign stop at a Morrisons store near Witney – the former Oxfordshire seat of Lord David Cameron where the Tories won with a 15,200 majority in 2019.He was also quizzed on the price of bread by BBC Breakfast during the visit."
The National,See the key points in the Scottish Greens' manifesto ahead of the General Election,"['The climate emergency', 'The economy', 'Wellbeing', 'Upholding democracy']",Lucy Jackson,2 July 2024 at 0:24 pm·3-min read,2,July,2024,00:24:00,3,"WITH the General Election just days away, candidates up and down Scotland will be looking to win over as many voters as they can before they head to the polls.Leading up to the election all the major UK parties have outlined their vision of what they would like to achieve in the next parliament in their manifestos.In the coming days, The National will take a closer look at all the pro-independence parties' documents.The Scottish Greens launched their manifesto on June 20 in Edinburgh, where the party said the battle to tackle climate change will be won or lost in the next UK Government term.Ahead of polling day, on July 4, here’s a look at the Scottish Greens' main points.The climate emergencyThe climate emergency is set out as the most urgent issue in the manifesto, taking up the first 11 pages.If the Scottish Greens were to get an MP, they have pledged to call on the UK Government to drop the “anti-climate” Offshore Petroleum Licensing Bill, revoke recently issued licences for new oil and gas extraction in the North Sea, and prohibit licences for new offshore oil, gas and coal exploration and extraction.(Image: PA)The Greens have been particularly vocal of late on the SNP’s “shameless retreat” on oil and gas after Kate Forbes claimed her party was not against new licences.Other climate proposals in the manifesto include a £28 billion per year Green New Deal investment programme, ending subsidies and handouts to the fossil fuel industry and returning the National Grid to public ownership with net zero as its “foundational mission”.The economyThe manifesto focuses on “taxing wealth, not workers”, suggesting the UK tax system unfairly places a higher tax burden on low-income workers.The Greens have pledged to introduce a progressive annual wealth tax on the top 1% of households in the UK, those with £3.4 million and above. This would start at a marginal tax rate of 1%, rising to 5% for those with £5.7m and above, and 10% for those with £18.2m.It is claimed this wealth tax would raise at least £70 billion for public services.READ MORE: Patrick Harvie blames 'deeply irresponsible' Rishi Sunak for postal vote 'chaos'The manifesto also pledges to tackle tax avoidance and evasion, merge national insurance into general income tax, the banning of zero-hour contracts and reform of inheritance tax to calculate it based on the circumstances of the recipient.The party also argues that with independence, Scotland would have full control over taxation and financial policy and the Greens are calling for full devolution of remaining taxation powers prior to independence.WellbeingThe Greens say they want a total ban on benefit sanctions which cause “extreme hardship” and will oppose any further increases to the state pension age, pressing for earlier access to the state pension for people with disabilities.Other proposals include an end to the benefit cap, bedroom tax and the two-child limit which has pushed 85,000 children in Scotland into poverty.READ MORE: Nuclear will ‘leave legacy of debt and radioactive waste’, says Lorna SlaterA whole page of the document is also dedicated to introducing a Universal Basic Income which would ensure everyone has enough to live a “basic but dignified life”.There is a proposal that a right to paid leave for people who need time off due to the effects of menstruation of the menopause should be created as well as a new legal entitlement to compasionate leave in the event of the death of a close relative or friend.Upholding democracyThe Greens’ manifesto puts forward an argument for a written constitution in an independent Scottish republic.(Image: PA)The power for Scotland to hold constitutional referendums should be devolved, the party says, but it is noted in the manifesto that “more works needs to be done to persuade the people of Scotland of the benefits of independence”.There are also arguments for removing Section 35 from the Scotland Act and repealing the Internal Market Act."
The Independent,"Farage not as dangerous as Le Pen because he is a one man act, Straw and Rifkind claim",[],David Maddox,2 July 2024 at 1:28 am·3-min read,2,July,2024,01:28:00,3,"Former foreign secretaries Jack Staw and Sir Malcolm Rifkind have dismissed concerns that Marine Le Pen’s National Rally (RN) topping the first round of the French election should be seen as a warning about Nigel Farage and Reform UK.The result in France has shocked Europe and threatened President Emmanuel Macron’s Le Marche centrist party with a major defeat. He is now dependent on a deal with the far left to keep RN out of power.Concerns have also been expressed after the shock result in France over the weekend with a number of people linking it to the rise of Reform in the polls in the UK election taking place on Thursday.Farage has pushed his party to second in some polls (Copyright 2024 The Associated Press. All rights reserved)Mr Farage has previously been pictured with Ms Le Pen, the French far right leader, and suggested he could work with her on issues like immigration. However, he also suggested that she could be a “a disaster” for France.Connections between the two had previously been made because of their shared views on immigration, both expressing criticism of the west over the war in Ukraine and their similar views on the culture war issues.Ms Le Pen is also believed to have looked at Ukip as a means of remodelling her party from its fascist past to a rightwing nationalist one.However, there are differences with Mr Farage taking a much more libertarian view to economic policy in particular.Le Pen’s party has topped the poll in France (REUTERS)And Mr Straw and Sir Malcolm insisted that the differences do not stop there. Neither expect Reform to perform a similar surge as RN because of crucial differences between the parties - not least because they believe Farage is “a one man show”.Sir Malcolm, who was John Major’s foreign secretary between 1995 and 1997, said: “They are not remotely comparable. Le Pen leads a major party, with a clear ideological identity and many years of growing popular support.“Farage has his own opinions and has some popularity as a campaigner. It is by no means clear if he will even win his own seat in Clacton.“His main objective is to damage the Tories by syphoning of votes that will help Labour win more MPs. He may or may not inflict real damage but he remains an individual not a cause.”Meanwhile, Mr Straw, who served as Labour’s foreign secretary from 2001 to 2006, argued that both Le Pen and Farage provided good reasons not to have a proportional representation electoral system.Former foreign secretary Jack Straw (Getty Images)He said: “I follow French politics as closely as I can. The RN did do very well in the first round but if the left alliance (Nouveau Front populaire) does withdraw in constituencies where it has come third, and Macron's Ensemble does likewise my guess is that the left and centre should win more seats together than the RN, but the RN are now plainly established as a very serious force in French politics.“For all sorts of reasons the RN is much better established than is Farage's lot. It's partly the voting system but partly because thanks to Brexit and Johnson's decision to expel many good One Nation Tories from their party in 2019 the far right rump inside the Tory Party is so much larger than it was - and Sunak has lacked the ability to control it.“Also British society is not so riven as is French in my view. But don't forget that the French voting system is ultimately a first-past-the-post system in the final ballot. If either France or the UK had a PR system God knows where we'd be - except in a mess.”"
The Independent,Farage amasses 39 billion video views as Reform dominate social media election battle,[],Alicja Hagopian,2 July 2024 at 0:21 pm·2-min read,2,July,2024,00:21:00,2,"Nigel Farage and Reform have made the biggest splash on social media of any UK party and politician this election.The right-wing party and its leader have amassed over 2.8 million reactions on Facebook since the start of the election, according to data analysed by Hootsuite, a social media analytics platform.Mr Farage’s official Facebook page alone has garnered 2,100,00 reactions and shares, with the Reform page taking 719,000. This marks by far the largest Facebook interaction rate for any party or politician.By contrast, prime minister Rishi Sunak received just 270,000 Facebook reactions, while Labour’s Sir Keir Starmer attracted 300,000.The Labour Party page has garnered 267,000 reactions since 22 May, when the election was called, while the Conservatives have gained just 163,000. The two parties’ combined Facebook engagements are at just 60 per cent of Reform’sMr Farage also leads engagement on X (Twitter), with 13.9 million likes and retweets; while his videos have been viewed a combined 39.4 billion times on the platform during the election.Tweets from the Reform account are also the highest for party engagement, at 9.3 million interactions.However, the Labour Party’s videos on X – including endorsements from Elton John — are the second most popular during the campaign, garnering 11.3 billion views, or 13.2 billion if combined with Sir Starmer’s account.This compares to 8.8 billion views for Mr Sunak and the Conservatives, 4.5 billion views for Reform alone, 4 billion views for the Green Party, and just 260.4 million views for Ed Davey and the Lib Dems.Meanwhile, Mr Sunak has the highest engagement on Instagram (2.6 million) since the election was called, due in part to his large following on Instagram – 3.6 million followers.What does this tell us? Not much necessarily, other than the fact that Reform’s target audience is highly engaged on social media, particularly Facebook. It is also unclear how much this engagement will translate into material gains this week.Crucially, while the party may have an increasingly wide reach on social media, it lacks concentrated support in most constituencies; with latest polls estimating Reform could win five seats at best.But it’s impossible to ignore that Mr Farage in particular has a social media star-power which other politicians have failed to leverage, with even the prime minister making a tiny splash on social media in comparison."
The Telegraph,The Daily T: Your definitive election night guide,[],Kamal Ahmed,2 July 2024 at 9:10 am·1-min read,2,July,2024,09:10:00,1,"It’s set to be one of the most dramatic and consequential general elections in decades - and likely a sleepless night for some. When will we know if Conservative ‘big beasts’ have lost their seats? Or the extent of a Labour landslide? Or whether Reform have won any seats at all? We have all the answers.In this special episode of The Daily T, Camilla and Kamal are joined by The Telegraph’s Data Editor Ben Butcher for your definitive hour-by-hour guide to the nail-biting seats to stay up for, when to go to bed, and when to crack open another Red Bull.Watch all episodes of the Daily T here or on YouTube.Or if you would prefer to listen to the audio only, then use the player above. You can also listen on Spotify, Apple Podcasts, or wherever you get your podcasts, and subscribe to The Daily T newsletter for updates. "
PA Media: UK News,Tories face backlash over attack on Starmer’s Friday night family time,[],"David Hughes, PA Political Editor",2 July 2024 at 3:10 am·4-min read,2,July,2024,03:10:00,4,"The Government’s antisemitism adviser has condemned “dangerous” attacks on Sir Keir Starmer over his desire to keep Friday nights free from work.The Labour leader, whose wife is Jewish, has come under fire from senior Tories after saying he wanted to avoid work after 6pm on a Friday to spend time with his family – although he acknowledged that would not always be possible.The Tories said that would make him a “part-time” prime minister while Cabinet ministers mocked him, suggesting he would refuse to go to work if there was an international crisis on a Friday evening.Friday night Shabbat dinners are important in the Jewish faith and Sir Keir has talked about making sure his children are aware of their heritage.The attack on Keir Starmer for asserting his right to family time on a Friday night, as he has done for many, many years, is so dangerous. So insidious from those aware of why he chooses to be with his family specifically on Friday evenings.— John Mann (@LordJohnMann) July 2, 2024Lord Mann, a Labour peer who was appointed as antisemitism adviser by Theresa May, said: “The attack on Keir Starmer for asserting his right to family time on a Friday night, as he has done for many, many years, is so dangerous.“So insidious from those aware of why he chooses to be with his family specifically on Friday evenings.”He told the PA news agency: “It’s a very strange thing to attack over. I’m the independent adviser to the Prime Minister and my advice would be this is not an area to stray into.”He pointed out that Friday nights had a wider cultural significance within the Jewish community, likening it to Sundays in Christian communities.“There’s a reason Parliament does not sit on Sundays,” he said.Sir Keir said Tory attacks on his desire to spend Friday evenings with his family were a sign of “increasing desperation, bordering on hysterical”.Asked about the criticism he has faced, he told reporters at a campaign event in Nottinghamshire: “This is just increasingly desperate stuff.”Shadow health secretary Wes Streeting said: “The attacks on him are a total disgrace and it shows how far these people have fallen, how heavily they’re scraping the barrel and why they need to be removed from office on Thursday.”Virtually every military intervention we’ve carried out has happened at night, partly to keep our servicemen & women safe.The British people will wonder who would be standing in for Starmer between 6pm & 9am – Angela Rayner, David Lammy, Ed Miliband?Defending Britain's…— Rt Hon Grant Shapps (@grantshapps) July 1, 2024Asked on Times Radio if he would work beyond 6pm on a Friday, Mr Streeting said: “I’m sure I will be and I’m sure Keir will be doing so too.”The Tories have repeatedly attacked Sir Keir since he made the comments on a Virgin Radio interview on Monday morning.Defence Secretary Grant Shapps said on X: “Virtually every military intervention we’ve carried out has happened at night, partly to keep our servicemen & women safe.“The British people will wonder who would be standing in for Starmer between 6pm & 9am – Angela Rayner, David Lammy, Ed Miliband? Defending Britain’s security isn’t a daylight hours only job.”Energy Secretary Claire Coutinho told LBC Radio: “I do think that it’s pretty unrealistic for a prime minister not to work past 6pm.“I also think it’s a bit odd because they’re also saying they want to make people in the NHS work overtime and at weekends, so I think to do that on one hand, and on the other hand say that you’re not going to work past 6pm is a bit tin-eared.”Labour leader Sir Keir Starmer with his wife Victoria at the state banquet for the Japanese emperor (Aaron Chown/PA)Sir Keir said protecting time to spend with his son and daughter made him more relaxed and a better decision-maker.The Labour leader and his wife Victoria have a 16-year-old son and a 13-year-old daughter.He told Virgin Radio: “We’ve had a strategy in place and we’ll try to keep to it, which is to carve out really protected time for the kids, so on a Friday – I’ve been doing this for years – I will not do a work-related thing after six o’clock, pretty well come what may.“There are a few exceptions, but that’s what we do.”He said that in politics “some people think, if you fill your diary 24/7 and don’t do anything else, that makes you a much better decision-maker”.“I don’t agree with that, I think you’ve got to make space, so we do it.”"
Yahoo News UK,"Who will win the next general election? Latest polls and oddsDespite recent dip in the polls, Sir Keir Starmer is still riding high, but is the 4 July general election already a done deal? We take a look.","[""Tories to be left 'small and unfamiliar', new super-poll predicts"", ""Reform UK snapping at Tories' heels as Labour takes dip"", ""Labour vote share drops to 'lowest in over two years'"", 'What are the latest odds?', 'What went wrong for the Tories?']",James Cheng-Morris and  James Hockaday,Updated 1 July 2024 at 11:07 am·8-min read,1,July,2024,11:07:00,8,"Labour's predicted share of the vote at the general election has fallen to its lowest level in months, according to recent projections.A model by research firm JL Partners, made for the Sunday Times, predicts Sir Keir Starmer's party to win 38% of the vote.This is a sizeable fall from 48% predicted by pollsters YouGov on 7 May and comes after the Labour leader's final televised debate against Rishi Sunak on the BBC on Wednesday.The head-to-head saw the Tory leader rip into Starmer's policies, accusing him of ""not being straight with people"" on issues including migration and tax.However, Labour is still riding high compared to its opponents, with JL Partners' latest model putting the party on track to win 450 seats, with a substantial majority of 250.Meanwhile the Tories are set to be reduced to just 105 seats, compared to the 365 they won in 2019 – spelling one of the party's biggest defeats on record.Here, Yahoo News UK summaries the positions of the parties according to three separate opinion polls.Tories to be left 'small and unfamiliar', new super-poll predictsThe number of senior Tory MPs expected to lose their seats after 4 July is ""too many to get your head round"", Scarlett Maguire of JL Partners told Times Radio.“If you take into account who will lose their seats along with who has already announced they will be stepping down, you really are left with, first, a small Conservative Party, with, you know, just 105 seats, but one that also doesn’t have that many familiar faces in it,"" she said.(JLP)JL Partners' projections have been made using a stacked regression post-stratification (SRP) model, which it says uses artificial intelligence (AI) and machine learning to gather more accurate and detailed results.It builds on a form of modelling known as multilevel regression and poststratification (MRP) – models that break the electorate down into small demographic chunks, predict their voting behaviour and then ""build"" a version of each seat in the country from the right mixture of demographics.SRP uses AI to combine estimates from many models into a single final estimate. Explaining why this is such a big deal in the world of political modelling, JLP says: ""The main advantage of this kind of stacking is that we can use different models to probe different parts of the data giving a more holistic set of predictions that consider many different facets of the data.""This includes models that are superior at unpicking the constituency level predictors whilst other models can investigate the individual level effects in much more detail.""Some models, like multilevel regression, can analyse both the individual level and constituency level data simultaneously. The combination of these models then produces estimates that more accurately represent the nuances in the underlying data.""Other noteworthy prediction in JLP's model, described as a ""super poll"" by the Times' chief political commentator Tim Shipman, is Reform UK winning two seats, with Nigel Farage predicted to win Clacton and Lee Anderson, who defected from the Tories in March, keeping hold of Ashfield.The Liberal Democrats are also tracked to regain their place as the third party of British politics, going from just 11 seats in the Commons to 55, while the Scottish National Party (SNP) are set to lose 33 seats, leaving only 15.The level of detail in JLP's model means the company has been able to put together a list of major Conservative MPs expected to lose their seats, including Jeremy Hunt, Penny Mordaunt, Grant Shapps, Mel Stride and Esther McVey.You can search for your constituency to find the projected winner and their margin of victory here. Reform UK snapping at Tories' heels as Labour takes dipYouGov's voting intention tracker currently predicts Labour to win 37% of the vote.Although it is still by far the highest scoring political party, it is a significant drop from the 47% recorded on 28 May – six days after Sunak called a surprise snap general election.There is only a 2% margin between Reform UK and the Tories, according to YouGov, with the Conservative's projected to win 20% of the vote, compared to 18% for Nigel Farage's party.Labour vote share drops to 'lowest in over two years'In another sign that Labour's success has plateaued, a recent poll for the Telegraph suggests there is only a 17% gap between the Tories and Starmer's party.This would leave Labour with its lowest predicted vote share since January 2022, when Boris Johnson was still prime minister, according to pollsters Savanta.However, this is unlikely to worry Starmer, as the poll still puts Labour on track to win 38% of the vote and a majority of more than 260 seats.🚨NEW Westminster Voting Intention for Sunday @Telegraph📈Lowest Labour vote share since January 2022🌹Lab 38 (-4)🌳Con 21 (=)➡️Reform 14 (=)🔶LD 11 (+1)🌍Green 6 (+1)🎗️SNP 2 (-1)⬜️Other 7 (+1)2,092 UK adults26-28 June (chg from 21-24 June) pic.twitter.com/cdyp3lJygQ— Savanta UK (@Savanta_UK) June 29, 2024Chris Hopkins, the director of political research at Savanta, told the Telegraph: “This is our lowest Labour vote share since Rishi Sunak became prime minister, and the Conservatives for their part do appear to have slowed or stopped their downward spiral.""He added that a rise in vote share for the Green Party and independent candidates will not have a significant impact on election day but could ""point towards trouble for the Labour Party in government and over the coming years"".What are the latest odds?As of 1 July, Oddschecker – a website which compares odds across different bookmakers – had Labour at 1/41 to win the most seats. To put that in context, this is seen as so likely that a £10 bet would return just £10.24.Bookies are putting the Conservatives at 125/1 to win the most seats, or to win a majority, with both scenarios so unlikely that a £10 punt would return £1,260.Reform UK has better chances, according to Oddschecker, with 80/1 odds of winning the most seats in the general election and 100/1 odds of having an overall majority.What went wrong for the Tories?So, why have the polls changed so dramatically? It's worth looking back on an extremely eventful four-and-a-half years in UK politics.According to YouGov's voting intention tracker (see chart above), Tory support peaked at 53%, with Labour on 32%, in April 2020, months after the party's stunning success in the 2019 general election and Boris Johnson's pledge to “get Brexit done”. That month also saw Starmer take over as Labour leader from Jeremy Corbyn.This was also amid a spirit of national unity following the onset of the COVID pandemic which nearly killed Johnson himself. The then-PM had been released from hospital five days before this particular survey was taken.Boris Johnson delivers his final speech as prime minister outside 10 Downing Street in September 2022. (AFP via Getty Images)Over the rest of the year, there was a downturn in support amid chaos over COVID rules, with the Tories falling as low as 35% in November 2020, compared to Labour on 40%.However, the UK’s successful COVID vaccination programme provided a pathway out of lockdown and with it, improved poll ratings. Tory support peaked at 41% in June 2021, with Labour at 30%.In October that year, there was a sense Johnson was untouchable. At the Tory party conference, the BBC's Laura Kuenssberg remarked how the PM was ""in total command of his party, and politically dominant in the country"".But this fell apart quickly with the Partygate scandal, which emerged in November that year. Time and again, reports emerged of government and Tory staff – including Johnson – having taken part in lockdown-era social gatherings when their own COVID rules had prohibited them.By January 2022, Tory support had plummeted to 28%, with Labour on 38%. Johnson struggled on, but never recovered and a wave of ministerial resignations forced him to resign in July that year.The UK had three separate prime ministers – Boris Johnson, Liz Truss and Rishi Sunak – between 6 September and 24 October, 2022. (Getty Images)His successor, Liz Truss, then embarked on arguably the most disastrous prime ministerial reign in history, characterised by the catastrophic ""mini-budget"", containing £45bn of unfunded tax cuts, which prompted an economic crisis. Like Johnson, she lost the confidence of Tory MPs – and voters – and had to resign.Her 49-day spell as PM was the shortest in history, with Tory support plummeting to 19% (with Labour on 56%) the day after she announced her resignation in October 2022.Rishi Sunak, who had lost to Truss in the previous month's Tory leadership election, took over. However, as the above YouGov chart indicates, he has failed to cut through with voters. Tory support was at 23% two days after he assumed office, with the most recent survey, carried out on Thursday, showing support is now lower than under Truss at 18%.In short, the polls and odds, not to mention other factors such as notable by-election victories for Starmer's Labour, are pointing to a Labour government next week.Your guide to votingHow to register to vote in the 2024 general electionWhat voter ID can I bring to the election?Who is standing in my constituency? Full list of every candidate mappedThe manifestosWhat is a manifesto?The Conservative election manifesto - in briefThe Lib Dem manifesto - in briefThe Labour manifesto - in briefThe leadersWho is Rishi Sunak? The PM battling to stay in power after election gambleWho is Keir Starmer? The toolmaker's son promising change for the UKWho is Ed Davey? Lib Dem leader attracting attention with election stuntsWho is Richard Tice? Reform’s former leader turned Farage sidekick "
Yahoo News UK,Who is Ed Davey? The Lib Dem leader whose life has been marked by adversity,"['His early life', 'His family', 'His parents', 'His education', 'Why is he a Sir?']",Hannah Fearn,Updated 1 July 2024 at 1:04 pm·3-min read,1,July,2024,01:04:00,3,"The youngest of three boys, Sir Ed Davey had a childhood marked by adversity. His mother died when he was a teenager and his father died when he was just four.As an adult, Davey now cares for his son, who is disabled with a neurological condition.So what do we know about the man who leads the third party in British politics?His early lifeEd Davey was born in Mansfield, Nottinghamshire, on Christmas Day in 1965. He was the youngest of three boys, but lost his father at just four years old and then his mother when he was in his mid-teens. She had spent three years battling cancer, during which time he nursed his mother together with his grandmother and brother Henry.Once a keen Scout and Air Scout, he later remembers feeling “isolated” at school because of his caring responsibilities, which meant he couldn’t take part in after-school activities or sports. “The last 18 months she was bedridden and in a lot of pain. I’d spend hours on the bed, talking to her,” he said. Davey was with his mother when she died at Nottingham General Hospital, after being placed on an unsuited dementia ward.After both his parents had died, Davey was brought up by his maternal grandparents in the village of Eakring, though his grandfather died soon after. He spent much of his childhood and young adulthood close to his grandmother. “First of all, she was looking after me. Then we were looking after each other,” he said.His familyDavey married Emily Gasson, a former Liberal Democrat parliamentary candidate who unsuccessfully stood in four elections and is now a councillor, in 2005 and the pair have two children, a son and daughter.Their son, John, born in 2007 and now a teenager, is disabled with a neurological condition. He has attended special schools but is now educated at home with a tutor – a change that Davey said led to him becoming verbal for the first time. He has spoken about his anxiety about who will care for his son when he and his wife are no longer around. “It’s the thing that worries me more than anything else in my life,” Davey said.Gasson was diagnosed with relapsing-remitting multiple sclerosis in 2012. She was well for many years following her diagnosis, but declined during lockdown and is working on recovering her physical strength.His parentsEd Davey, pictured with his family. (Liberal Democrats)His father, John, was a solicitor and his mother, Nina, a teacher. Davey has described how he was inspired to study by his mother, who always wanted him to try hard academically and who he wanted to impress.His educationDavey attended the private Nottingham High School, the alma mater of former chancellor Kenneth Clarke. He became head boy, with Labour MP Ed Balls – who was studying in the year below – watching on.After school, he achieved a first class degree in philosophy, politics and economics at Jesus College, Oxford where he was junior common room president. After becoming an economics researcher for the Liberal Democrats he returned to study, reading for a master’s degree in economics at Birkbeck College, London.Ed Davey as Secretary of State for Energy and Climate Change alongside the then leader of the Lib Dems, Nick Clegg, and Jo Swinson, pictured during the coalition government in 2015. (Getty)Why is he a Sir?For three years, the Lib Dem leader was a member of the cabinet in the Tory-Lib Dem coalition government, holding the post of secretary of state for energy and climate change from 2012 to 2015. He was knighted in the 2016 New Year’s Honours for “political and public services”."
The National,See the key points in the SNP's manifesto ahead of the General Election,"['Scottish independence', 'Public spending', 'Energy', 'Brexit', 'Cost of living', 'NHS', 'Other areas']",Alasdair Ferguson,2 July 2024 at 10:56 am·4-min read,2,July,2024,10:56:00,4,"WITH the General Election just days away, candidates up and down Scotland will be looking to win over as many voters as they can before they head to the polls.Leading up to the election all the major UK parties have outlined their vision of what they would like to achieve in the next parliament in their manifestos.In the coming days, The National will take a closer look at all the pro-independence parties' documents.The SNP launched their manifesto on June 19 in Edinburgh where John Swinney made clear his party's plan is to put the screws to a likely Labour government, in the hopes of moving Keir Starmer further to the left.Ahead of polling day, on July 4, here’s a look at the SNP’s main points.READ MORE: See the key points in Alba's manifesto ahead of the General ElectionScottish independenceFront and centre in the manifesto is the pledge that a vote for the SNP is a vote for an independent Scotland.The party claims if it wins the most Scottish seats at the General Election, it will consider this a mandate to request permission from Westminster for another independence referendum.It also outlines arguments for independence, pointing to cases of “more successful” small independent European nations like Ireland, Denmark, and Sweden.Public spendingThis is a huge talking point for every major party and the SNP are no different, as their manifesto states they want an end to “14 years of Tory-imposed austerity”.The document outlines how SNP MPs would demand the “full” devolution of taxes to Holyrood, including the windfall tax on oil and gas companies.It also sketches out how they would spread it out over a “wider” range of companies than what is proposed by Labour and the Tories, to “tackle the twin crises of cost of living and climate change”.They have also proposed scrapping the Government’s current fiscal rules as they would replace them with a new framework which would allow for increased levels of capital investment.EnergyEnergy is another big topic for all parties across this election campaign, as the ongoing crisis still affects millions of households up and down the country.The SNP have called on the UK government to “take an evidence-based approach to oil and gas”.While not specifically backing new licences in their manifesto, they say new permissions should be given for fossil fuel exploitation if such developments pass “a robust climate compatibility assessment”.The manifesto states: “We believe any further extraction must be consistent with our climate obligations and take due account of energy security considerations.”BrexitThe party has doubled down on its opposition to Brexit and accused Labour and the Tories of failing to “talk about what we’ve lost, or how much worse off we are with Brexit”.The document outlines the SNP’s vision for an independent Scotland in the European Union and how they would regain what has been lost as a result of a hard Brexit.The party states they would aim to harness the opportunities an independent Scotland would be offered if they were to rejoin the EU.Cost of livingThe SNP manifesto calls for a hefty package of measures to help ease the cost-of-living crisis across Scotland.They want cut-price bills for “all who need”, cuts to standing charges, and a new fuel poverty scheme made by combining the Warm Home Discount and Energy Company Obligation.They have also called for a “simplified” Help to Buy ISA.NHSThe party’s manifesto has set out plans to “protect the NHS from Westminster privatisation” as the party has warned Labour during this campaign to keep their hands off it.The SNP say they would introduce a “Keep the NHS in Public Hands” Bill to stop “any UK government undermining the principles and protections of the NHS as part of any future trade deal” and demand that the NHS gets £10bn extra each year.They have also called on the UK Government to “match Scotland’s NHS pay deals” at around £6bn.However, the SNP say this would result in £1.6bn for the Scottish NHS each year through the Barnett formula.Other areasThe party has reiterated its calls for a ceasefire in Gaza.Protecting women’s rights to have abortions.An end to “punitive” welfare reforms.Taking a “public health” approach to tackling the drugs death crisis, including the legalisation of drugs.Supporting compensation calls for Waspi women, the victims of the infected blood scandal, the victims of the Equitable Life scandal and the victims of the Post Office Horizon scandal."
Yahoo News UK,"Will Nigel Farage's Reform UK 'beat' the Tories in the election?With some polling figures putting the Tories and Reform UK nearly neck and neck, could Farage's party really end up with nearly as many MPs as Sunak's?","['What do the latest polls say?', 'Could Reform UK get more MPs than the Tories?', 'Could the Lib Dems be the official opposition party?', 'What is proportional representation?']",James Cheng-Morris and  Ellen Manning,Updated 14 June 2024 at 5:33 am·7-min read,14,June,2024,05:33:00,7,"Leading pollster John Curtice has poured cold water on suggestions that Reform UK is now beating the Conservative Party in the general election polls.As representatives from seven parties took prepared to take part in a TV debate on Thursday, a YouGov survey for The Times newspaper said Reform’s support had increased by two points to 19%, putting them ahead of the Tories for the first time.Reform UK leader Nigel Farage took the the opportunity to hail the poll results in the debate, declaring: “We are now the opposition to Labour.”But Curtice urged caution, insisting that single polls should not be relied on. He told Radio 4's Today programme: ""This is one poll - we’ve actually, I think, had four other polls published in the last 24 hours - none of which have had Reform ahead, not even all of which have had Reform gaining ground, but quite a couple of them certainly suggesting it’s also got very close.""He said it may not be the case that Reform are ahead - and could be on average four or five points behind. But he said: ""This is still bad news for the Conservatives. The only way Rishi Sunak can hope to get even to base camp in narrowing the lead that Labour have started off with this campaign was to squeeze the Reform vote.""He added: ""Rather than making progress, things are actually going backwards, not least of course because of Nigel Farage’s decision to fight this campaign.""With many speculating that Reform UK with Farage at the helm could ""beat"" the Tories, Yahoo News UK takes a look.What do the latest polls say?YouGov’s voting intention tracker, updated on Tuesday, suggests the Tories and Reform UK are neck and neck.With Labour well ahead on 38%, the Tories are trailing on 18% – compared to a high of 53% under Boris Johnson in 2020 – with Reform UK just behind on 17% and the Liberal Democrats on 15%.However, there are multiple polls taking place at any one time by a number of different companies.According to the PA news agency, an average of all polls that were carried out wholly or partly during the seven days to June 13 puts Labour on 43%, 21 points ahead of the Conservatives on 22%, followed by Reform on 14%, the Lib Dems on 10% and the Greens on 6%.And while Reform’s average is up one percentage point on the figure for the previous week and the Tories are down one point, there is still an eight-point gap, on average, between the two.Could Reform UK get more MPs than the Tories?Unless something remarkable happens, in short: 'No' - and that's because of the first past the post (FPTP) voting system in which the candidate with the largest number of votes in their constituency is elected.According to the Electoral Reform Society, which is against FPTP, this system leads to a situation where “even if millions of voters support the same party, if they are thinly spread out across the UK they may only get the largest number of votes in a couple of these contests – so only win a few MPs"".“Tens of thousands of voters supporting a different party, but who live near each other, could end up with more MPs. This means the number of MPs a party has in parliament rarely matches their popularity with the public.”Rishi Sunak on the campaign trail on Wednesday. (AFP via Getty Images)Farage knows this well. As the leader of UKIP in the 2015 election, he saw his party win 12.6% of the nationwide vote and one seat. The Liberal Democrats won 7.9% of the vote... and eight seats.Indeed, YouGov last week released a poll – put together using the multi-level regression and post-stratification (MRP) surveying technique, from a sample size of nearly 60,000 respondents – which suggested the Tories would win just 140 seats, having won 365 in 2019. But this is still 140 more than the zero it projected Reform UK to win, in spite of its strong polling figures.The model had Reform UK ""performing strongly in a number of seats but still a long way off winning in any"", with projected second-placed finishes in 27 constituencies.YouGov's MRP projection. (YouGov)Granted, this model was formed between 24 May and 1 June, before Farage's headline-grabbing intervention on Monday last week in which he announced he would be standing as an MP.But, even as Reform UK polls closer than ever to the Tories, it's difficult to imagine the party winning more than a handful of seats.Chris Hopkins, director at polling firm Savanta, told Yahoo News UK that in one respect, Reform UK is at an advantage compared to Ukip in 2015 because ""Ukip took votes from both Labour and the Conservatives, and we are not seeing that with Reform UK – they are all coming from the Conservatives.""That is the consequence of Rishi Sunak making immigration a centrepiece of the campaign and failing to deliver on it. Even if you have voters that are neutral on immigration, they would say the small boats policy has been a disaster.""But even so, Hopkins said, Reform UK is still ""at a huge electoral disadvantage"" in that its votes are not very concentrated, they are very evenly spread.""There are going to be some races where Reform UK is strong - the Nigel Farage factor in Clacton is really interesting - but realistically its ceiling is five seats: and that’s a high ceiling.""Could the Lib Dems be the official opposition party?Liberal Democrat leader Sir Ed Davey on a campaign visit in Henley-in-Arden, Warwickshire, on Wednesday. (PA)Like Reform UK, Sir Ed Davey’s Liberal Democrats are performing well in the polls.In a sign of how defensive the Tory campaign is becoming, one online party advert claims voting for Reform UK or the Lib Dems could give Labour 100 extra seats, resulting in the biggest majority in its history.It depicts a scenario where the Conservatives are beaten into third place behind the Lib Dems, with just 57 seats, despite getting 19% of the vote and without Reform winning a single seat.Read more: Pollsters got it wrong in 2015, so could Labour’s lead be overestimated? (The Guardian)However, it remains unlikely the Lib Dems will finish second. YouGov’s MRP poll projected the party performing strongly, winning 48 seats. This would be up 37 from 2019, but still nowhere near the Tories’ projected 140.However, amid all this talk about projections, it’s worth remembering they are still only polls and not a definite indicator of how people will vote on 4 July. The 1992 and 2015 elections are notable examples of how polling didn’t match the end results of Tory wins.What is proportional representation?Proportional representation, as defined by the UK parliament, is an electoral system ""in which the distribution of seats corresponds closely with the proportion of the total votes cast for each party. For example, if a party gained 40% of the total votes, a perfectly proportional system would allow them to gain 40% of the seats.""This differs from the first past the post system, as set out above, in that a relatively high vote share rarely corresponds with increased seats for the smaller parties. In 2019, for example, the Lib Dems won 11.5% of the vote but only 1.7% – 11 – of the 650 seats.Unsurprisingly, both Reform UK and the Lib Dems support proportional representation.The Lib Dems this week made it part of their manifesto, with the party saying it would introduce the single transferrable vote method, a form of proportional representation which allows electors to rank their preference of candidates on the ballot.The party previously sought to change the UK’s voting system while in the coalition government under then-leader Nick Clegg, but voters rejected the plan in a 2011 referendum.Keir Starmer profile: The toolmakers' son vowing to 'rebuild Britain'Rishi Sunak profile: The PM battling to stay in power of election gambleHow to register to vote in the 2024 general electionWhich MPs are standing down before the next election? Full list mappedThe key issues that will decide the electionWhen is the first UK general election TV debate?What is purdah? The strict rule that governs what politicians can and can't say"
Yahoo News UK,"Three important UK election issues, explainedRishi Sunak said his leadership is needed in 'uncertain' times. Keir Starmer said the country needs to be 'rebuilt'. So what issues do voters care about most?","['The economy', 'Health', 'Immigration and asylum']",James Cheng-Morris,Updated 28 May 2024 at 10:11 am·5-min read,28,May,2024,10:11:00,5,"After months of speculation, Rishi Sunak confirmed the general election will be held on 4 July.The prime minister said Labour leader Sir Keir Starmer could not be trusted to lead the country through “uncertain” times. He made the economy and combating global security the key elements of his pitch to the nation as he announced the election date.In response, Starmer told voters: “Together we can stop the chaos, we can turn the page, we can start to rebuild Britain.”But amid this “uncertainty” and need to “rebuild”, what do the voters consider the key issues?This chart, produced using YouGov polling over the course of this parliament, offers an insight in the issues voters care most about and how that has ebbed and flowed over time.Compared to when Boris Johnson's Tories won the December 2019 poll, the economy, immigration, defence and tax have grown in importance in the eyes of the electorate. This has come amid the cost of living crisis; small boats crossing the English Channel; the onset of the Ukraine war and wider global instability; and the highest tax burden in 70 years.Housing has also become a bigger concern, with the Renters Reform Bill - in which the government pledged to scrap no-fault evictions - having been paused after Sunak called the election.Meanwhile, the last general election was fought - and won by the Tories - on a single issue: Brexit. Yet the chart shows a clear downturn in its relevance among voters, particularly after a trade deal was agreed with the EU in December 2020.This next chart, meanwhile, highlights what voters have considered the top issues over the past year. By a wide margin, the top three are the economy, health and immigration and asylum.Here, Yahoo News UK breaks down what is behind these issues and how they have ebbed and flowed in importance among voters since the last election in 2019.The economyThe unprecedented lockdown called by Boris Johnson in March 2020 meant the public’s attention shifted to the economy, as demonstrated by the huge spike in the chart above. The then-chancellor Rishi Sunak was forced to implement a £70bn furlough scheme, lasting 18 months, to protect people’s jobs.There was a second almighty economic shock - and rise in public concern - in February 2022 following Russia’s invasion of Ukraine. This caused a further spike in an already turbulent wholesale energy market, driving up costs for suppliers and ultimately customers.Average energy bills eventually reached £2,500 a year (and would have exceeded £4,000 had the government not intervened). This was double the £1,278 consumers were paying before the war and by the time this election takes place, people will still be paying much more than this: £1,568.Energy prices were also a key driver in inflation reaching 11.1% - a 41-year high - by October 2022, though it has since fallen to 2.3%, which is near the Bank of England’s 2.0% target.The third economic shock of this parliament - and most damaging for the Tories - was in October 2022 when Liz Truss and Kwasi Kwarteng's disastrous “mini budget”, containing £45bn of unfunded tax cuts, prompted an economic crisis. It led to soaring interest rates, and to this day homeowners who are remortgaging are facing significantly higher bills.HealthHealth, like the economy, is another issue which clearly correlated with the beginning of the pandemic. The above chart shows an enormous spike in public concern when COVID cases started to multiply in March 2020, ultimately leading to the nationwide lockdown as the NHS faced collapse.Cases fell that summer, but spikes in the chart can be seen once infections rose again and fresh nationwide lockdowns were imposed in October 2020 and January 2021. By March 2022, likely as concerns over the Omicron variant faded, there was much less concern about health.In January last year, there was a brief spike as the NHS in England experienced the biggest industrial action in its history, with tens of thousands of nurses and ambulance staff walking out simultaneously.As for the state of play going into the election, NHS waiting lists remain higher than they were when Sunak vowed to cut them last year. According to the latest figures, an estimated 7.54 million treatments were waiting to be carried out at the end of March, relating to 6.29 million patients.Immigration and asylumSince the last election, the immigration and asylum narrative has largely revolved around one issue: small boats crossing the English Channel.The numbers have risen in most of the intervening years: there were 1,843 crossings in 2019, 8,466 in 2020, 28,526 in 2021, 45,774 in 2022 and 29,437 last year. This year, the number has already passed the 10,000 mark.The regular sharp spikes in the above chart demonstrate how frequently crossings have been in the news, including some occasions when hundreds of migrants have made the dangerous journey in a single day.But it also reflects how the government has made this part of its own agenda. It was Boris Johnson’s government which first announced plans to deport migrants to Rwanda in April 2022. That policy was picked up by Rishi Sunak when he became prime minister in October that year, with Sunak since repeating his pledge to “stop the boats”.But after calling the election, Sunak admitted this week that flights would not take off before the country goes to the polls.Read moreFive important laws that could be dropped due to Sunak's snap election (Yahoo News UK)OPINION - Rishi Sunak has been in last-ditch campaign mode for so long — a General Election is logical (Evening Standard)Door open for Boris Johnson to campaign for Tories, Rishi Sunak signals (PA Media)"
The Independent,Starmer refuses to guarantee anybody a job in his new government,[],David Maddox,2 July 2024 at 0:20 pm·2-min read,2,July,2024,00:20:00,2,"Sir Keir Starmer has refused to guarantee any of his top team a job in his new cabinet as Labour appears to be closing in on victory.The Labour leader was pressed on the issue in his final broadcast interview with the BBC’s political editor Chris Mason as he toured the key battleground seats in the midlands.Mr Mason pressed Sir Keir: “People deserve to know who might be running some of the big aspects of the state come Friday, if you are to win. Will the senior figures in your shadow cabinet to take those respective roles in government if you do win?Labour Party leader Sir Keir Starmer and shadow chancellor Rachel Reeves (Stefan Rousseau/PA) (PA Wire)But Starmer ducked the question.He said: “Chris, I'm not going to get ahead of myself and announce, say, cabinet or possible cabinet.”Pushed further on his shadow chancellor Rachel Reeves, he responded: “To do so two days before the election to do so would to be complacent. And you would never expect a leader to do that.Pressed again on his top team, he added: “Well, I'm not going to run through a list of names however hard you try. But what I will say, because this is important, is that in each of the briefs in each of the departments we've been working on for years, on what needs to change how it needs to change how it needs to fit together, we want a purpose driven government, which will make material change for our country for the better.”It is a stark contrast to the 1992 election when Neil Kinnock infamously introduced his next cabinet on the stage before polling day at a rally in Sheffield only to lose.The answers come amid speculation that Sir Keir could make some dramatic changes to his cabinet from his current shadow cabinet team.In particular, questions have been asked about David Lammy becoming foreign secretary with suggestions that former cabinet minister Douglas Smith, who is hoping to make a return to parliament as MP for East Lothian, could get the job instead.Others are thought to be at risk even with a sizeable Labour victory with the Greens hoping to unseat shadow culture secretary Thangam Debbonaire in Bristol West and an independent candidate posing problems for Shabana Mahmood in Birmingham Ladywood.There have also been calls from some on the left of the party for Wes Streeting to not get the role as health secretary because of his support of using the private sector to bring down waiting lists.Sir Keir may also be looking for a new role for his campaign coordinator Pat McFadden who has been a major figure in the campaign."
